Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.110

Legislative records—Contribution of papers by legislators and employees.

Nothing in RCW 40.14.010 and 40.14.100 through 40.14.180 shall prohibit a legislator or legislative employee from contributing his or her personal papers to any private library, public library, or the state archives. The state archivist is authorized to receive papers of legislators and legislative employees and is directed to encourage the donation of such personal records to the state. The state archivist is authorized to establish such guidelines and procedures for the collection of personal papers and correspondence relating to the legislature as he or she sees fit. Legislators and legislative employees are encouraged to contribute their personal papers to the state for preservation.

[ 2011 c 336 s 819; 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 3.]